incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="afrodizi/akum__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aka</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aku</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akum</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aku</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akum</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akom</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akum</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ák</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akám</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aká</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akách</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aká</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akami</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aká</l>
        <r>akum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Koda/ň__BASESG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ne</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ň</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ň</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ň</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kapuc/ňa__BASESG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ne</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňu</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňa</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňa</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ama__BASESG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drumb/ľa__BASESG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>li</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľu</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>li</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľa</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľa</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ga/ťa__BASESG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>te</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťu</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťa</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťa</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="reg/ula__BASESG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kaps/ula__BASESG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="afrodiziakum"><i>afrodizi</i><par n="afrodizi/akum__n"/></e>
